Massachusetts, session 194th, H2911.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The fourth paragraph of paragraph (h) of subdivision (1) of section 4 of
chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by
adding the following sentence:- Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
members in service of a retirement system eligible for creditable service under this paragraph
may make application for said creditable service at any time.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of chapter 71 of the acts of 1996, as most recently amended by
section 2 of chapter 468 of the acts of 2002, is hereby amended by striking out the second and
third paragraphs.
of 1